Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-903
Reentry program; development; reentry program administrator; purpose of program; parolees; reentry plans; department; duties.

(1) The Department of Correctional Services, in consultation with the Board of Parole, shall develop a reentry program for individuals incarcerated in a department correctional facility, individuals who have been discharged from a department correctional facility within the prior eighteen months, and parolees. The department shall hire a reentry program administrator to develop and oversee the reentry program and additional staff as needed to implement the reentry program.

(2) The purpose of the reentry program is to facilitate a standard systemwide program of reentry for individuals leaving correctional facilities or transitioning off community supervision. The primary objectives of the reentry program are to reduce recidivism, to identify, assess, and provide treatment options for individuals with mental illness, to increase public safety, and to improve the overall transition of the individual from the criminal justice system into the community.

(3) The department shall develop and implement individual, comprehensive reentry plans for parolees. Such plans shall address housing, employment, health care, substance abuse treatment, mental health services, and other essential needs to support successful community reintegration. The department shall provide necessary resources and support to parolees to facilitate their adherence to their reentry plans.

Laws 2014, LB907, § 13;

Laws 2018, LB258, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB631, § 48.
July 19, 2024